Colorado, session 2026A, HB1281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Within the current Colorado sentencing structure, originally
based on the Model Penal Code, there exists confusion and imbalance in
offenses involving the extreme indifference mental state in crimes
resulting in death;
(b) As a result, Colorado has become one of the most punitive
states in the country for extreme indifference or similar mental states but
has not appropriately addressed aggravating circumstances and most
-2- 1281

common culpable mental states for other crimes. Legislation that will
create a more thoughtful and balanced sentencing structure that is
consistent with Colorado case law while responsive to the need for
community safety is necessary.
(c) Accountability for deaths caused by drivers in Colorado
requires a fuller range of defined crimes and penalties to account for
differences in mental state and aggravating circumstances; and
(d) The alignment of Colorado's homicide crimes with national
standards will better serve Colorado and our criminal legal system.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-102, amend
(1)(d); and add (2.5) as follows:
18-3-102. Murder in the first degree.
(1) A person commits the crime of murder in the first degree if:
(d) Under circumstances evidencing an attitude of universal
malice manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life
generally, he THE PERSON knowingly engages in conduct which creates a
grave risk of death to a person, or persons, other than himself THEMSELF,
and thereby:
(I) Causes the death of another; or MORE THAN ONE PERSON;
(II) CAUSES THE DEATH OF ONE PERSON AND CAUSES SERIOUS
BODILY INJURY TO TWO OR MORE PERSONS BY MEANS OF A DEADLY
WEAPON;
(III) CAUSES THE DEATH OF A CHILD WHO IS UNDER TWELVE YEARS
OLD; OR
(IV) CAUSES THE DEATH OF A PEACE OFFICER, EMERGENCY
MEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDER, EMERGENCY MEDICAL CARE PROVIDER, OR
FIREFIGHTER ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.
-3- 1281

(2.5) IF THE PERSON'S ACTIONS ARE THE CAUSE OF DEATH OR
SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO MORE THAN ONE INDIVIDUAL PURSUANT TO
THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION, EACH INDIVIDUAL
INJURED OR KILLED IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION OF THE LAW.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-103, amend (1)
and (4) as follows:
18-3-103. Murder in the second degree - definitions.
(1) A person commits the crime of murder in the second degree
if:
(a) The person knowingly causes the death of a person; or
(b) Acting either alone or with one or more persons, he or she THE
PERSON commits or attempts to commit felony arson, robbery, burglary,
kidnapping, sexual assault as prohibited by section 18-3-402, sexual
assault in the first or second degree as prohibited by section 18-3-402 or
18-3-403, as those sections existed prior to July 1, 2000, or a class 3
felony for sexual assault on a child as provided in section 18-3-405 (2),
or the felony crime of escape as provided in section 18-8-208, and, in the
course of or in furtherance of the crime that he or she THE PERSON is
committing or attempting to commit, or of immediate flight therefrom,
the death of a person, other than one of the participants, is caused by any
participant; OR
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 18-3-102 (1)(d), UNDER
CIRCUMSTANCES EVIDENCING AN ATTITUDE OF UNIVERSAL MALICE
MANIFESTING EXTREME INDIFFERENCE TO THE VALUE OF HUMAN LIFE
GENERALLY, THE PERSON KNOWINGLY ENGAGES IN CONDUCT THAT
CREATES A GRAVE RISK OF DEATH TO ANOTHER PERSON OR PERSONS, AND
AS A RESULT CAUSES THE DEATH OF ONLY ONE OTHER PERSON.
-4- 1281

(4) A defendant convicted pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall be sentenced by the court in accordance with the provisions
of section 18-1.3-406; EXCEPT, WHEN THE CRIME CAUSED THE DEATH OF
ANOTHER PERSON, THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION TO A TERM OF
INCARCERATION OF AT LEAST THREE TIMES THE MINIMUM TERM
AUTHORIZED IN THE PRESUMPTIVE RANGE AND UP TO TWICE THE MAXIMUM
TERM AUTHORIZED IN THE PRESUMPTIVE RANGE.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-2-101, amend (4);
and add (7.5) as follows:
18-2-101. Criminal attempt.
(4) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, criminal
attempt to commit a class 1 felony is a class 2 felony; criminal attempt to
commit a class 2 felony is a class 3 felony; criminal attempt to commit a
class 3 felony is a class 4 felony; criminal attempt to commit a class 4
felony is a class 5 felony; AND criminal attempt to commit a class 5 or 6
felony is a class 6 felony.
(7.5) CRIMINAL ATTEMPT TO COMMIT A VIOLATION OF SECTION
18-3-102 (1)(d) OR 18-3-103 (1)(c) IS A CLASS 3 FELONY, AND THE COURT
SHALL SENTENCE THE PERSON IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 18-1.3-406.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-3-105 as
follows:
18-3-105. Criminally negligent homicide.
(1) (a) Any A person who causes the death of another person by
conduct amounting to WITH criminal negligence commits criminally
negligent homicide. which
(b) IF A PERSON OPERATES OR DRIVES A MOTOR VEHICLE WITH
-5- 1281

CRIMINAL NEGLIGENCE AND THE CONDUCT IS THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF
THE DEATH OF ANOTHER PERSON, THE PERSON COMMITS CRIMINALLY
NEGLIGENT HOMICIDE.
(2) CRIMINALLY NEGLIGENT HOMICIDE is a class 5 felony.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-239, repeal
(4)(d) as follows:
42-4-239. Use of a mobile electronic device - definitions -
penalty.
(4) (d) If the individual's actions are the proximate cause of death
to another, the individual commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense
and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-125, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(a) as follows:
42-2-125. Mandatory revocation of license and permit.
(1) The department shall immediately revoke the license or permit
of any A driver or minor driver upon receiving a record showing that the
driver has:
(a) Been convicted of vehicular homicide or vehicular assault as
described in sections 18-3-106 and 18-3-205 C.R.S., or of criminally
negligent homicide WHILE OPERATING OR DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE, as
described in section 18-3-105, C.R.S., while driving a motor vehicle
SECTION 18-3-105 (1)(b);
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 42-2-128 as
follows:
42-2-128. Vehicular homicide - criminally negligent homicide
while operating a motor vehicle - revocation of license.
The department shall revoke the driver's license of any A person
-6- 1281

convicted of vehicular homicide PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-106 OR
CRIMINALLY NEGLIGENT HOMICIDE PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-105
(1)(b), including the driver's license of any A juvenile who has been
adjudicated a delinquent upon conduct which THAT would establish the
crime of vehicular homicide PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-106 OR
CRIMINALLY NEGLIGENT HOMICIDE PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-105 (1)(b)
if committed by an adult.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-202, amend
(2)(a)(V) as follows:
42-2-202. Habitual offenders - frequency and type of
violations.
(2) (a) An habitual offender is a person having three or more
convictions of any of the following separate and distinct offenses arising
out of separate acts committed within a period of seven years:
(V) Vehicular assault or vehicular homicide, or manslaughter or
criminally negligent homicide which results from the operation of WHILE
OPERATING OR DRIVING a motor vehicle PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-105
(1)(b), or motor vehicle theft, as such THE offenses are described in title
18;
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1301, amend
(6)(e) as follows:
42-4-1301. Driving under the influence - driving while
impaired - driving with excessive alcoholic content - definitions -
penalties.
(6) (e) Involuntary blood test - admissibility. Evidence acquired
through an involuntary blood test pursuant to section 42-4-1301.1 (3)
shall be IS admissible in any A prosecution for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI,
-7- 1281

or UDD, and in any A prosecution for criminally negligent homicide
WHILE OPERATING OR DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE pursuant to section
18-3-105, C.R.S. SECTION 18-3-105 (1)(b), vehicular homicide pursuant
to section 18-3-106 (1)(b), C.R.S., assault in the third degree pursuant to
section 18-3-204, C.R.S., or vehicular assault pursuant to section
18-3-205 (1)(b). C.R.S.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1301.1,
amend (3) as follows:
42-4-1301.1. Expressed consent for the taking of blood, breath,
urine, or saliva sample - testing - rules - definition.
(3) Any A person who is required to take and to complete, and to
cooperate in the completing of, any A test or tests shall cooperate with the
person authorized to obtain specimens of such THE person's blood, breath,
saliva, or urine, including the signing of any release or consent forms
required by any A person, hospital, clinic, or association authorized to
obtain such THE specimens. If such A person does not cooperate with the
person, hospital, clinic, or association authorized to obtain such THE
specimens, including the signing of any release or consent forms, such
THE PERSON'S noncooperation shall be IS considered a refusal to submit
to testing. No A law enforcement officer shall NOT physically restrain any
A person for the purpose of obtaining a specimen of such THE person's
blood, breath, saliva, or urine for testing except when the officer has
probable cause to believe that the person has committed criminally
negligent homicide WHILE OPERATING OR DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE
pursuant to section 18-3-105, C.R.S. SECTION 18-3-105 (1)(b), vehicular
homicide pursuant to section 18-3-106 (1)(b), C.R.S., assault in the third
degree pursuant to section 18-3-204, C.R.S., or vehicular assault pursuant
-8- 1281

to section 18-3-205 (1)(b), C.R.S., and the person is refusing to take or to
complete, or to cooperate in the completing of, any test or tests, then in
such event, the law enforcement officer may require a blood test.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-106, add (1.5)
as follows:
18-3-106. Vehicular homicide - definitions.
(1.5) IF A PERSON OPERATES OR DRIVES A MOTOR VEHICLE IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY ONE OR MORE OF
THE FOLLOWING AGGRAVATING CIRCUMSTANCES ARE PRESENT, THE
PERSON COMMITS AGGRAVATED VEHICULAR HOMICIDE AND THE COURT
SHALL SENTENCE THE PERSON IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 18-1.3-406
FOR THE LEVEL OF OFFENSE COMMITTED IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (1)
OF THIS SECTION:
(a) THE PERSON COMMITS THE OFFENSE AFTER HAVING TWICE BEEN
PREVIOUSLY CONVICTED OF THE OFFENSE OF DRIVING UNDER THE
INFLUENCE OR DRIVING WHILE ABILITY IMPAIRED;
(b) THE PERSON COMMITS THE OFFENSE AFTER HAVING BEEN
PREVIOUSLY CONVICTED OF VEHICULAR HOMICIDE OR VEHICULAR
ASSAULT;
(c) THE PERSON COMMITS THE OFFENSE WHILE ELUDING OR
ATTEMPTING TO ELUDE A PEACE OFFICER IN VIOLATION OF SECTION
42-4-1413;
(d) THE PERSON COMMITS THE OFFENSE WHILE IN FLIGHT FROM THE
COMMISSION OF ANOTHER FELONY OFFENSE, NOT INCLUDING A TRAFFIC
OFFENSE; OR
(e) THE PERSON COMMITS THE OFFENSE WHILE DRIVING AT A HIGH
RATE OF SPEED IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 42-4-1101 (12)(b), CREATING AN
-9- 1281

IMMINENT RISK OF DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER
PERSON.

SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-406, add
(2)(d) as follows:
18-1.3-406. Mandatory sentences for violent crimes -
definitions.
(2) (d) "CRIME OF VIOLENCE" ALSO MEANS A VIOLATION OF
AGGRAVATED MOTOR VEHICLE HOMICIDE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-3-106 (1.5).
SECTION 14. Effective date - applicability. This act takes
effect July 1, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after said
date.
SECTION 15. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-10- 1281